Hawaii statutes.
[§379A-1] Picketing of residence or
dwelling prohibited. It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in
picketing before or about the residence or dwelling place of any individual.
Nothing herein shall be deemed to prohibit[:]

(1) The picketing in any lawful manner, during a
labor dispute, of the place of employment involved in such labor dispute; or

(2) The holding of a meeting or assembly on any
premises commonly used for the discussion of subjects of general public
interest. [L Sp 1949, c 8, §2; RL 1955, §300-2; HRS §757-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt
of §1]

Revision Note

In the last sentence, (1) and (2) reformatted as paragraphs
(1) and (2) pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next